New York, session 2025-2026, S7250.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 458-a of the real 2 property tax law, as amended by chapter 473 of the laws of 2004, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) In addition to the exemption provided by paragraph (a) of this 5 subdivision, where the veteran served in a combat theatre or combat zone 6 of operations, as documented by the award of a United States campaign 7 ribbon or service medal, or the armed forces expeditionary medal, navy 8 expeditionary medal, marine corps expeditionary medal, or global war on 9 terrorism expeditionary medal, qualifying residential real property also 10 shall be exempt from taxation to the extent of [ten] thirty-five percent 11 of the assessed value of such property; provided, however, that such 12 exemption shall not exceed [eight] forty thousand dollars or the product 13 of [eight] forty thousand dollars multiplied by the latest state equal- 14 ization rate for the assessing unit, or in the case of a special assess- 15 ing unit, the class ratio, whichever is less. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to assess- 17 ment rolls prepared on or after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11463-01-5